languagetool-language-modules/wa/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/wa/hunspell/wa_BE.dic
abandnêyes/v	st:abandner
abats/v*	st:abate
abelixh/v
abidler/v
abiyes/vm*	st:abiyî
abloké/vj*	st:abloker
aboirdé/vja*	st:aboirder
abossixh/v	..MS.
abouné/vna*	st:abouner
abridler/v
abrutixh/vm	..MS.
aburtaké/v
abwesné/vja
acahutes/v
acawé/vaj
acdure/v
acheves/v
acleves/v	..MS.
acoejhixh/va
acolé/v
aconcoistêyes/v*	st:aconcoister
acoplé/vaj
acoujhnêyes/v*	st:acoujhner
acoûtrer/v
acrotchî/v
acwatchixh/v*	st:acwatchi
adaweyes/v*	st:adawyî
adiercî/vaj*	st:adiercî
adjinçnêyes/v*	st:adjinçner
adjudikes/v	..MS.
admetou/va
adrouves/v
adviné/v
adåres/v
adûs/v
afitchî/vaj
afolé/v
afroyes/v*	st:afroyî
agaloufes/v
agrancixh/v	(=si rafyî)
agrifes/v
aguintchtêyes/v
ahertcheyes/v
ahoté/va	(ahoter: djoker)
alaidixh/v
aloumé/vj
amakes/v
amenes/v
amoenné/v
amonucioné/v
amoussî/v*	st:amoussî
amôrtixh/v
aniches/v
anlevé/v
anutixh/v
aparinté/vaj
apicî/v
aplonkes/v
aporçûs/v
aprepyî/v	(ariver tot près)
aproves/v
apåjhtêyes/v
araezes/v
arindjî/va
arlandé/v
aroutines/v
aschines/v
ascwatixh/v
ashonnes/v
asplanes/v
aspritchî/vaj
asseuwes/v
assoxhes/v
assôré/v
astapes/v
astoké/vj
aståvlé/v	(H: nén "atåvler"? pus corant)
atapé/v
atenixh/v	(rinde tene)
atoné/v
atrais/v
atroclé/vj
atåveles/v
aveulé/va
avolé/v
axhoré/vaj
balanciné/v
baltêyes/v
banslé/vj
barloké/v
bats/v
bawé/vj
behotes/v
berdoutes/v
berloufes/v
berwetes/v
betchfesses/v
bikes/v
biyté/vj
blakes/v
blawtêyes/v
blonces/v
boerlêyes/vm
bolé/v
botes/v
boulones/v
boureates/v
boutes/v
boûs/v
bressé/v
brichôdé/v
briké/v
brohiné/v
broyes/vm
brunixh/v
bråylé/vj
buskintes/v
båboté/vj
båré/v
bômé/v
cabloncî/v
cachî/v
cafroyes/v
calones/v
calôdé/v
candôzes/v
caressî/va
carwaitî/v
catoûnes/v
caytêyes/v
chifrêyes/v
chitroumfé/vi
chåchoté/v
chôzes/v
cires/v
clapotes/v
clawes/v
clicoté/v
cloupé/v
coberôles/vi
cohatchî/via
cominces/vi
consideres/v
contribouwé/vaj
copiné/vj
coschires/vi
cotrawes/vi
couyoné/va
crailé/v
crevådé/v
criyî/v
croxhes/v
cwefes/v
côré/v
dawes/v
dediyî/va
dessiné/v
dibrôlé/vi
dilapoté/vi
dinné/v
disbalé/vja
disbouloné/v
dischinds/vi
discoirdoné/v
discraplé/v	..MS.
discwåtlé/v
disfaitixh/v
disgadjes/v
disloyî/vja
dispaitches/v
disployes/v
disraloyes/v
dissôlé/via
distoides/v
disvoyes/v
divou/via
djemixh/vj	(ou djumixh ?)
djustifeyes/v
dobeles/v
droucté/va	(H: drougté)
ebales/v
ecaissî/vaj
ecrené/v	[v.]
edjavé/vj
efornêyes/v
egueuyî/vj
elides/v
emoenné/va
epleminté/vaj
epîté/vj
escoursixh/v
essontêyes/v
etones/v
eviyî/va	(aveur eveye)
fafyî/v
flaires/v
foirtifeyes/v
forneles/v
foumes/v
frawtinêyes/v	.H.S.	
froyné/v
gargouyes/vm
golé/v
gripé/v
guinché/v
hagnes/v
hapé/v
heres/v
houwes/v
hårpixhes/v
imprimes/v
invoké/v
kimaxhî/vija
kitapes/vi
lanciné/vj*	st:lanciner
letchî/va
lopes/v
lûs/v
manaedjes/v
masses/v
metou/va
modes/v
motixh/v
mucheyes/v	
måssegnî/va
naxhyî/vj
nonnes/v
odes/v
otintifeyes/v
parexhes/v
pestelé/v
pierdou/va
plais/v
plitchté/vj
pormoennes/v
preparé/va
profité/v
préjhes/v
påpyî/v
pûnixh/v
rabouné/va*	st:rabouner
racertiné/vaj
raconté/vaj
racrotchî/vaj
radjîstêyes/v
raflåwixh/v
ragregnes/v
ralonguixh/va
ramoenné/vja
ranairî/v
rapinsé/v
raprofondixh/v	(rifonde a "raparfondi" ?)
rascoveres/v
raspité/v	..MS.
rastoké/v
ratifeyes/v
ravalé/va
rawijhes/v
recrestêyes/v
refantixh/v	(ridivni efant)
remilé/vj
rescompinses/v
resprinds/v
retrôclé/vaj
rexhou/va
riboelé/vi
ricinses/ivm
ricopyî/vjai
ridemaré/vij
ridoblé/vji*	st:ridobler
rifroté/vi
rihoukî/viaj
rilopé/vi
rimetou/vaji
rimwaijhixh/vi
rinicté/iv
ripeuplé/via
riplåstrixh/vi
rischandixh/vi
rispådes/v
rissintou/via
ritapes/vi
ritoumes/vi
rivindou/viaj
rizingueles/iv
ronfeles/v
råveles/v
sacrifeyes/v
sawoure/v
schavné/v
schité/v
schuré/v
seres/v
sibaré/vait
sicoles/vi
siervi/v
singnes/v	.H.S.
sipepeyes/vi
sipoûlé/vij	(bobiner on fyi so li spoûle)
sipôzes/vi
sititchî/viaj
sitrindou/ivaj
sognes/v
sonné/vajt	(piede do sonk)
sospires/v
supôzes/v
taeyes/v
tchafté/vj
tchesses/v
tchoûles/v
tchûtchlotes/v
tiré/vja
toumes/v
travayes/v
trimpes/v
trotiné/v
tîçlé/v
vexhådes/v
vindjî/va
voyes/v
waites/v
wårdé/vaj
xhuflotes/vm
zouplé/v
årdjintêyes/v
